North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-10 The State Board of Higher Education
15-10-52.
Grant review committee — Compensation.

Each member of the grant review committee is entitled to receive compensation in the amount of one hundred thirty-five dollars per day plus reimbursement for expenses as provided by law for state officers if the member is attending meetings or performing duties directed by the committee. The compensation provided for in this section may not be paid to any member of the committee who receives a salary or other compensation as an employee or official of this state if the individual is serving on the committee by virtue of the individual’s state office or state employment.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 34, § 9; 2015, ch. 131, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 5 of chapter 131, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by
section 5, of chapter 131, S.L. 2015, was to remove the expiration date of the section.

15-10-53.
Definition.

For purposes of sections 15-10-48 through 15-10-52, projects dedicated to the advancement of enhanced academics include investments in research, scholarships, technology, endowed chairs, and investments in educational infrastructure, but exclude scholarships intended solely for the benefit of athletics, campus facility repair projects, and new capital construction projects.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 34, § 10; 2015, ch. 131, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 131, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by section 6, of chapter 131, S.L. 2015, was to remove the expiration date of the section.

15-10-54.
Assessment of institutions. [Expired]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 135, § 2.

15-10-55.
Student journalists — Freedom of expression — Civil remedy.

As used in this section:

“Protected activity” means an expression of free speech or freedom of the press.

“School-sponsored media” means any material that is prepared, substantially written, published, or broadcast by a student journalist at a public institution of higher education, distributed or generally made available to members of the student body, and prepared under the direction of a student media adviser. The term does not include any media intended for distribution or transmission solely in the classroom in which the media is produced.

“Student journalist” means a student of a public institution of higher education who gathers, compiles, writes, edits, photographs, records, or prepares information for dissemination in school-sponsored media.

“Student media adviser” means an individual employed, appointed, or designated by a public institution of higher education to supervise or provide instruction relating to school-sponsored media.

Except as provided in subsection 3, a student journalist has the right to exercise freedom of speech and of the press in school-sponsored media, regardless of whether the media is supported financially by the institution or by use of facilities of the institution or produced in conjunction with a class in which the student is enrolled. Subject to subsection 3, a student journalist is responsible for determining the news, opinion, feature, and advertising content of school-sponsored media. This subsection may not be construed to prevent a student media adviser from teaching professional standards of English and journalism to student journalists. A student media adviser may not be dismissed, suspended, or disciplined for acting to protect a student journalist engaged in a protected activity or for refusing to infringe on a protected activity.

This section does not authorize or protect expression by a student that:

Is libelous, slanderous, or obscene;

Constitutes an unwarranted invasion of privacy;

Violates federal or state law; or

So incites students as to create a clear and present danger of the commission of an unlawful act, the violation of institution or state board of higher education policies, or the material and substantial disruption of the orderly operation of the institution.

An expression of free speech or freedom of the press made by a student journalist under this section may not be construed as an expression of school policy. A school, school official, employee, or parent or legal guardian of a student journalist may not be liable in any civil or criminal action for an expression of free speech or freedom of the press made by a student journalist, except in the case of willful or wanton misconduct.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 133, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 126, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

15-10-56.
Disciplinary proceedings — Right to counsel for students and organizations — Appeals.

Any student enrolled at an institution under the control of the state board of higher education has the right to be represented, at the student’s expense, by the student’s choice of either an attorney or a nonattorney advocate, who may fully participate during any disciplinary proceeding or during any other procedure adopted and used by that institution to address an alleged violation of the institution’s rules or policies. This right applies to both the student who has been accused of the alleged violation and to the student who is the accuser or victim. This right only applies if the disciplinary proceeding involves a violation that could result in a suspension or expulsion from the institution. This right does not apply to matters involving academic misconduct. Before the disciplinary proceeding is scheduled, the institution shall inform the students in writing of the students’ rights under this section.

Any student organization officially recognized by an institution under the control of the state board of higher education has the right to be represented, at the student organization’s expense, by the student organization’s choice of either an attorney or nonattorney advocate, who may fully participate during any disciplinary proceeding or during any other procedure adopted and used by the institution to address an alleged violation of the institution’s rules or policies. This right only applies if the disciplinary proceeding involves a violation that could result in the suspension or the removal of the student organization from the institution. This right applies to both the student organization that has been accused of the alleged violation and to the accuser or victim.

Any student who is suspended or expelled from an institution under the control of the state board of higher education for a violation of the rules or policies of that institution and any student organization that is found to be in violation of the rules or policies of that institution must be afforded an opportunity to appeal the institution’s initial decision to an institutional administrator or body that did not make the initial decision for a period of one year after receiving final notice of the institution’s decision. The right to appeal the result of the institution’s disciplinary proceeding also applies to the student who is the accuser or victim.

The right of the student or the student organization under subsection 1 or 2 to be represented, at the student’s or the student organization’s expense, by the student’s or the student organization’s choice of either an attorney or a nonattorney advocate, also applies to the appeal.

The issues that may be raised on appeal include new evidence, contradictory evidence, and evidence that the student or student organization was not afforded due process. The institutional body considering the appeal may consider police reports, transcripts, and the outcome of any civil or criminal proceeding directly related to the appeal.

Upon consideration of the evidence, the institutional body considering the appeal may grant the appeal, deny the appeal, order a new hearing, or reduce or modify the suspension or expulsion. If the appeal results in the reversal of the decision or a lessening of the sanction, the institution may reimburse the student for any tuition and fees paid to the institution for the period of suspension or expulsion which had not been previously refunded.

For purposes of this section, “fully participate” includes the opportunity to make opening and closing statements, to examine and cross-examine witnesses, and to provide the accuser or accused with support, guidance, and advice. This section does not require an institution to use formal rules of evidence in institutional disciplinary proceedings. The institution, however, shall make good faith efforts to include relevant evidence and exclude evidence which is neither relevant or probative.

This section does not affect the obligation of an institution to provide equivalent rights to a student who is the accuser or victim in the disciplinary proceeding under this section, including equivalent opportunities to have others present during any institutional disciplinary proceeding, to not limit the choice of attorney or nonattorney advocate in any meeting or institutional disciplinary proceeding, and to provide simultaneous notification of the institution’s procedures for the accused and the accuser or victim to appeal the result of the institutional disciplinary proceeding.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 134, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

15-10-57.
Unified workforce, vocational, and technical education program system.

The state board of higher education shall establish and maintain a unified system to offer workforce training, vocational education, and technical education programs at institutions under its control. The board shall periodically review programs offered by institutions under its control and revise program offerings based on the workforce needs of the state identified by the workforce education advisory council. The board shall develop administrative arrangements that make possible the efficient use of facilities and staff. The board shall limit administrative costs by eliminating duplicative administrative positions.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 10, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

15-10-58.
Workforce education advisory council — Membership — Duties.

The state board of higher education shall establish a workforce education advisory council to advise the board regarding skills and qualifications needed for workforce training, vocational, and technical education programs offered at institutions under the control of the board. The council is composed of a representative of the department of career and technical education, a representative of job service North Dakota, a representative of the department of commerce, and eight members representing business and industry in the state. The eight members representing business and industry shall be appointed by the chairman of the legislative management. The North Dakota university system office shall provide staff services for the advisory council and members of the council who are not employees of the state are entitled to expense reimbursement from the board, as provided by law for state officers, for attending meetings of the council.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 11, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

15-10-59.
Annual report — Scholarships. [Effective through July 31, 2024]

The state board of higher education shall provide to the legislative management an annual report regarding the number of North Dakota scholarships, North Dakota academic scholarships, and North Dakota career and technical education scholarships provided and demographic information pertaining to the recipients.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 12, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 159, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 15-10-59 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2289; and Section of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2289.

15-10-59.
Annual report — Scholarships. [Effective August 1, 2024]

The state board of higher education shall provide to the legislative management an annual report regarding the number of North Dakota scholarships provided and demographic information pertaining to the recipients.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 12, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 159, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 159, § 2, effective August 1, 2024.

15-10-60.
Scholarship endowment fund — Rules. [Repealed]

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 153, § 1, effective May 14, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 368, § 9, effective April 10, 2017.

15-10-61.
Dual-credit courses — Pilot program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 3, § 19, effective July 1, 2019.

15-10-62.
Nickel trophy.

To promote national recognition and statewide enthusiasm, the legislative assembly encourages the university of North Dakota and the North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science to play for the nickel trophy during the course of a national collegiate athletic association football game. If the athletic director or president of either institution elects not to play for the nickel trophy, the nickel trophy must be permanently displayed in the heritage center.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 28, § 7, effective July 1, 2017.

15-10-63.
Capital projects.

An institution under the control of the state board of higher education may undertake a facility renovation project only if the project will reduce the deferred maintenance amount of the facility by no less than seventy five percent of the total cost of the renovation. The institution shall maintain documentation that demonstrates the cost and scope of the deferred maintenance reduction that results directly from the renovation. This subsection does not apply to projects undertaken solely to correct building code deficiencies or to installations of infrastructure determined by the board to be essential to the mission of the institution.

Facility construction and renovation projects undertaken by an institution under the control of the state board of higher education must conform to campus master plan and space utilization requirements approved by the state board of higher education.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 28, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 6 of chapter 28, S.L. 2017, pertaining to capital project and capital lease requests was vetoed by the Governor. Chapter 450, S.L. 2017. In letter opinion 2017-L-04, the Attorney General opined the Governor's veto of subsections 1, 2, and 5 of Section 6 of chapter 28, S.L. 2017 is authorized by law; and the Governor's veto of subsections 3 and 4 of Section 6 of chapter 28, S.L. 2017 is not authorized by the Constitution of North Dakota and is not effective.

This section is set out above to reflect a correction from the state since the 2017 cumulative supplement. The final determination on the validity of the 2017 veto was made, and subsequent effect was given only to former subsections (3) and (4).

15-10-64.
University of North Dakota men’s varsity golf program.

If certain real property known as the Ray Richards golf course or Ray Richards golf course addition, 3801 demers avenue, lot 1, block 1, and Ray Richards golf course addition, 3501 demers avenue, lot 2, block 1, in the records of the city of Grand Forks, or any portion of the property, is conveyed, fifty-three and fifty-seven one hundredths percent of the sale price must be transferred to a permanent endowment fund named the Ray Richards golf endowment fund, which must be controlled and administered by the university of North Dakota alumni foundation for the sole benefit of the university of North Dakota men’s varsity golf program in honor of the Ray Richards family. If the university of North Dakota men’s varsity golf program has been terminated prior to the conveyance, so much of the funds in the Ray Richards golf endowment fund as necessary must be used to reinstate the program, and the remainder must be used for the sole benefit of the program.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 3, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.

15-10-65.
Student voting documents.

An institution of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education may issue students enrolled at the institution a printable document containing the institution’s letterhead or seal using a self-service process. The document must contain the student’s legal name, current residential address in the state, the date the residential address was established, and date of birth. When issuing the document to students, an institution of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education shall provide each student with information regarding voter eligibility requirements.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 165, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.